Utah statutes.
78B-5-511.   Injunctive relief, damages, or both allowed against creditor to
prevent violation of chapter -- Costs and attorney fees.
An individual or the spouse or a dependent of the individual is entitled to
injunctive relief, damages, or both, against a creditor or other person to
prevent or redress a violation of this part.  A court may award costs and
reasonable attorney fees to a party entitled to injunctive relief or damages.
